Hawaii, session 2025, GM1278.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that addressing mental
health needs early in life is imperative for better health and
well-being in adulthood. Adverse childhood experiences, which
are various forms of trauma during a child's development, are
linked to a greater likelihood of lifelong risky behaviors that
can lead to chronic diseases and poor mental health, including
depression, anxiety, and suicidality.
The importance of children and adolescent mental health was
emphasized during the COVID-19 pandemic, which significantly
impacted the social, emotional, and mental well-being of youth
globally. Hawaii children and adolescents, like those in other
states in the nation, were more likely to have depression and
anxiety after the first year of the COVID-19 pandemic.
The child and adolescent mental health division of the
department of health is the State's medicaid provider of
intensive mental health services for youth. Services provided
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO

Page 2
S.B. NO. 2^^
by the division may be described as a multi-tiered and
multi-agency system of care.
The child and adolescent mental health division receives
referrals from, and provides mental health services in
coordination and collaboration with, other state government
agencies, as appropriate. For example, the division may receive
a client who is housed in a detention home, has been abused, and
has dropped out of school. The division will provide the child
with treatment and services in coordination with other state
agencies, including the judiciary, child welfare services, and
department of education, that may be involved given the child's
circumstances. To minimize disruptions in the daily lives of
the clients and their families, the division provides its
clients with community-based services and supports by
contracting with mental health professionals who practice near
or in the communities where eligible children and adolescents
live.
The purpose of this Act is to clarify and update the
responsibilities of the child and adolescent mental health
division of the department of health to reflect the current
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO 2
IlllillOlllllllilllllUIIIIIII

Page 3
S.B. NO.
mental health systems of care that address mental health needs
of children and adolescents in the State.
SECTION 2. Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part XV to be appropriately
S designated and to read as follows:
"§321- Definitions. As used in this part:
"Client" means a child or adolescent who is receiving
services from the child and adolescent mental health division.
"Division" means the child and adolescent mental health
division of the department of health."
SECTION 3. Section 321-171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the title of part XV to read as follows:
"PART XV. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES FOR CHILDREN AND [YOUTH]
ADOLESCENTS"
SECTION 4. Section 321-171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§321-171 [Ghiidafen-i-e-ffieatai] Mental health services [-r]
for children and adolescents; department responsibility. It
shall be the responsibility of the department of health to:
(1) Provide [preventative] preventive health services for
children and [youth-/ ] adolescents; and
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO

Page 4
S.B. NO.
• h.D. 2
(2) Provide diagnostic and treatment services for
emotionally disturbed children and —asd
-(- 3-)- -Provide treatment and rehabilitative seisvicos--for
mentally ill-eh-ildron--and youth.
Sueh] adolescents■
These services shall be delivered [at the earliest possible
moment] as soon as reasonably possible after the need for [such]
th^ services is established. [Aii] Subject to the availability
of federal or state resources, eligible children and [-yewth]
adolescents between the ages of birth and seventeen years shall
receive the necessary mental health services to [insure] ensure
their proper and full development. [If-fehoro io any
adjudieation or settlement of a-ny legal action -involving the
deiivety—ef—ehiide?efi-’-s—mentai—heaith—se^viees-T—the] The
department of health shall be responsible for the coordination
of carrying out the terms of [the] any judgment or settlement [-r]
related to the delivery of mental health services to children
and adolescents, as required by this section."
SECTION 5. Section 321-172, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO
nnniiiiiHHiiiMiin

Page 5 1442
S.B. NO
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
"§321-172 [Children's montai health-services branch.]
Child and adolescent mental health division. There [ie] shaJJ^
be established within the department of health [7—men-t-al- health
divi-sieftT—a- chi-l-dren' a] a child and adolescent mental health
[sorvicco branch] division, which shall coordinate the effective
and efficient delivery of mental health services to children and
[youth,1 adolescents, including services provided by private
nonprofit agencies under contract to the department of health,
and be responsible for the development and implementation of
centralized and highly specialized programs for children and
[youth.] adolescents."
SECTION 6. Section 321-173, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§321-173 [Community mental heal-feh-services] Family
guidance centers for children and [youth.-- Thoro is ostablishod
within-CQch community mental-health oenter a chil-d-r-en-'-s—mental
health sorvicco team-which/] adolescents. The division shall
implement and administer family guidance centers. The family
guidance centers, in conjunction with other public and private
agencies, shall develop and provide a network of preventative,
early identification, screening, diagnostic, treatment, and
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO

Page 6
S.B. NO.
rehabilitative services for children and [youth] adolescents
based on the needs of each [goographio region] county in which
the [community mental health] family guidance center is located.
The [children's mental-health- gerv-ieco teams] division shall
cooperate with and promote the coordination of the activities of
local public and private agencies servicing children and [youth]
adolescents in their [particular geographi-e-a-rea-.-] county or the
closest county that has resources and services that meet the
client's needs."
SECTION 7. Section 321-174, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§321-174 Coordination of services with department of
education. The [children's] child and adolescent mental health
services team shall cooperate with the schools located in their
particular geographic region in identifying and referring for
treatment such children or [youths] adolescents in need of
mental health services. In conjunction with the [•ehiidte«-’-&]
child and adolescent mental health services team, the department
of education and the department of health shall develop a
memorandum of agreement which shall provide for a sharing of
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO

Page 7
S.B. NO. --
responsibilities for the affected agencies and shall include but
not be limited to provisions for:
(1) Accepting referrals from the school counselors and
diagnostic teams for evaluation and direct treatment
of children and [yewfeh-] adolescents suffering from
mental and emotional disorders;
(2) Providing consultation to enable teachers and other
school personnel to aid in the identification and
screening of children and adolescents in need of
professional mental health services and the services
of psychologists, as defined in chapter 465;
(3) Providing training and education about emotional
disturbances of children and adolescents to teachers,
school counselors, and parents;
(4) Assisting the department of education with mental
health services and the services of psychologists, as
defined in chapter 465 for handicapped children [-r] and
adolescents;
(5) Developing an ongoing mechanism to assess, document^^
and report to the legislature and the governor unmet
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO

Page 8
S.B. NO. --
* • h.D. 2
needs for mental health services for students in each
geographic region; and
(6) Performing other related services for school
personnel, children, adolescents, and parents."
SECTION 8. Section 321-175, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§321-175 Statewide [children's] child and adolescent
mental health services plan. (a) Commencing [on September 1,
4r98-6-r] no later than twenty days before the convening of the
regular session of 2027, and every five years thereafter,
the [eh-ildren ' s mon-tal-hcalth sorvioos branch,—efi—er-^e^ere
September 1 of each four-year cycle/] division shall develop and
[present-] submit to the governor and the legislature [7—as—well
as release fer— publie—i-nspeet-ion-and-eommcnt, ] a current
statewide [eha-idren-^] child and adolescent mental health
services plan [whieh] that shall include:
[-<-34- A—aarve-y—ef—the—ehiidreft—and—yeeth-erfi—the—State—whe
are——in need ef—and——receiving-mental health
services—showing-the total number of—ouch children-and
youth and their geographic distribution;
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO 8
liifflflMBiiiiiiiniiii

Page 9
S.B. NO.
-{-2-)- Idcnt-if ication-e-f—■and private providere- ef-
mental health Gcrviecs to children—ofid youth;
4-3-)- Identification of the-oritcria and standards for-the
treatment "to be roceiv-od by omotional-l-y—d-i-s-fe-urbod or
mentally- ill children and youth;
4-4-)- A-^j?€)g-ram for the recruitment,—orientation,—and—in—
ocrviec training of ■personnel—in community mental
health aerviees -fee—children and youth/—and to al-l-i-ed
fields/—including■partieipation/—as—appropriate/—by
institutions of higher learning/—state and local
agcncios/—and other public and priv-a-fee a-gefte-ies having
relevant exper-ti-so;
44^] (1) An assessment of the mental health needs of
children and adolescents in the State;
(2) An assessment of resources available to meet the
mental health needs of children and adolescents in the
State;
(3) Identification of gaps between needs and available
resources;
(4) A description of the provisions for prevention, [early
identif-ireaferi-on-,-] diagnosis, screening, and treatment,
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO 9

Page 10 S.B. NO 1442
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
[aftd] which is inclusive of rehabilitation
[ (including,—wi-th rcgard-t-o treatment and
rchabilitatien/—DcrviecD provided through inpatient,
outpatient/—and oommun-ity rc-a-i-dontial- facilities)—e^-
children and-youth in need of mental health services;
Ah ■■implementation plan for providing ■me-n-ta-l- heal-th
ocrviceo to a-11 childj?en and youth in the State in
ea-eh—ef—tAe—above—ffieHti©fted—arEeas-7—and
Any -additional mattcr-o which -may—be—necessary—er
appr-epr-i-ato/—including rccommondatione—for amendment
of laws/—changes in administr-at-ivc-pr-actiecs and
patterns—of erganiaation,—aftd—eheftgee—in Icve-le-and
patterns of financial support' relating to children’
monta-l--hcalth serviee-s—] ; and
(5) Recommendations to the governor and legislature on how
to meet the mental health needs of children and
adolescents.
(b) [Pri-er--to] Before the submission of the statewide
[child-reH-'-e] child and adolescent mental health services plan
under subsection (a) to the governor and the legislature, the
department of health shall hold public hearings on the plan in
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO 10

Page 11
S.B. NO. --
accordance with [chapter 91.] section 92-41. There shall be at
least one hearing in each county; [ejeeeptr] provided that the
city and county of Honolulu shall have three hearings in
strategic geographic locations to provide the widest exposure of
the plan to the population.
(c) Any amendments to the statewide [children '-s] child and
adolescent mental health services plan shall be made after
public meetings held in accordance with [chapter 91.] subsection

SECTION 9. Section 321-176, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
["§321-1-76—Biennial-review of progress.-- Every two years,
starting Januarry-l-,—1-9-7-9).—the department- -ef -health-/—on—or- before
January 1 of each two-year cyclo,—shall submit to the
■legirs4-ahtH?e—and—the—gover^ftcr^-a—reperf^-eeht-iftg—^er^feh-i-
-(-14- A detailed analysis of the progress made toward
f-alfilling ■ the statewide children's mental health
scrvicee—plan- developed under-sccti-on 321-175;—and
-(3-)- 0-t-he-r- ■matters-- which are—necessary or appropriate,
including -rocommendationo for any■amendment -to any
-iawT—any ehange—in—the - -admi-ni-etrati-vc practices—and
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO

Page 12
S.B. NO. --
pafetorns of organization^—the—eu-r-roft-fe and prevailing
memoranda of -agreemen-t-,—and-any ■ ohange in the levels
and patterns—of—financial support."]
SECTION 10. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2967 SB1442 HD2 HMSO 12
■■■IIIIIIIIIBIIliill

S.B. NO.
"-2
APPROVED this 6th of June • 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 1442, S.D. 2, H.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW AFI
Date: April 16, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
President of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1442, SD 2, HD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 4, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby eertify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives